Hawaii statutes.
[§205-42] Important agricultural lands;
definition and objectives. (a) As used in this part, unless the context
otherwise requires, "important agricultural lands" means those lands,
identified pursuant to this part, that:

(1) Are capable of producing sustained high
agricultural yields when treated and managed according to accepted farming
methods and technology;

(2) Contribute to the State's economic base and
produce agricultural commodities for export or local consumption; or

(3) Are needed to promote the expansion of
agricultural activities and income for the future, even if currently not in
production.

(b) The objective for the identification of
important agricultural lands is to identify and plan for the maintenance of a
strategic agricultural land resource base that can support a diversity of
agricultural activities and opportunities that expand agricultural income and
job opportunities and increase agricultural self-sufficiency for current and
future generations. To achieve this objective, the State shall:

(1) Promote agricultural development and land use
planning that delineates blocks of productive agricultural land and areas of
agricultural activity for protection from the encroachment of nonagricultural
uses; and

(2) Establish incentives that promote:

(A) Agricultural viability;

(B) Sustained growth of the agriculture
industry; and

(C) The long-term agricultural use and
protection of these productive agricultural lands. [L 2005, c 183, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next